District of Columbia statutes.
9-1011

Nonstop flights.

An air carrier may not operate an aircraft nonstop in air transportation between Washington National Airport and another airport that is more than 1,250 statute miles away from Washington National Airport.

History

Oct. 30, 1986, 100 Stat. 3341-376, Pub. L. 99-591, § 6012

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1511.

Short Title

Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 9-1001.